Washington statutes.
RCW 36.54.135

County ferry districts—General indebtedness, bond issuance.

(1) A county ferry district may incur general indebtedness, and issue general obligation bonds, to finance the construction, purchase, and preservation of passenger-only ferries and associated terminals and retire the indebtedness in whole or in part from the revenues received from the tax levy authorized in RCW 36.54.130.

(2) The ordinance adopted by the county legislative authority creating the county ferry district and authorizing the use of revenues received from the tax levy authorized in RCW 36.54.130 must indicate an intent to incur this indebtedness and the maximum amount of this indebtedness that is contemplated.

[ 2007 c 223 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2007 c 223: See note following RCW 36.57A.220.